test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-housut_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - housut - ok : # Noun 'bukser' - ei tsekattu
     housut+N+Pl+Nom: housut
     housut+N+Pl+Gen: houssuitten
     housut+N+Pl+Par: houssui
     housut+N+Pl+Tra: houssuiksi
     housut+N+Pl+Abe: houssuitta
     housut+N+Pl+Ine: houssuissa
     housut+N+Pl+Ela: houssuista
     housut+N+Pl+Ill: houshuin
     housut+N+Pl+Ade: houssuila
     housut+N+Pl+Abl: houssuilta
     housut+N+Pl+All: houssuile
     housut+N+Pl+Ess: houssuina
     housut+N+Pl+Com: houssuine
